District of Columbia statutes.
16-1316

Time for surrender of possession under declaration of taking; adjustment of charges.

Upon the filing of the declaration of taking provided for by section 16-1314 , the court may fix the time within which and the terms upon which the parties in possession shall be required to surrender possession to the plaintiffs. The court may make such orders in respect of incumbrances, liens, rents, taxes, assessments, insurance, and other charges, if any, as it deems just and equitable.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 574, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-1316.
1973 Ed., § 16-1316.